cli/src/main/resources/wordguess_hunspell_pl.aff
SFX J   ć         sz        nieć
SFX J   ć         0         nieć
SFX J   ć         my        nieć
SFX J   ć         cie       nieć
SFX J   ieć       ą         nieć
SFX J   eć        ę         [mp]ieć
SFX J   eć        sz        [mp]ieć
SFX J   eć        0         [mp]ieć
SFX J   eć        my        [mp]ieć
SFX J   eć        cie       [mp]ieć
SFX J   eć        ą         [mp]ieć
SFX J   ieć       zę        sieć
SFX J   eć        sz        sieć
SFX J   eć        0         sieć
SFX J   eć        my        sieć
SFX J   eć        cie       sieć
SFX J   ieć       zą        sieć
SFX J   eć        ę         leć
SFX J   eć        isz       leć
SFX J   eć        i         leć
SFX J   eć        imy       leć
SFX J   eć        icie      leć
SFX J   eć        ą         leć
SFX J   eć        ę         reć
SFX J   ć         sz        reć
SFX J   ć         0         reć
SFX J   ć         my        reć
SFX J   ć         cie       reć
SFX J   eć        ą         reć
SFX J   eć        ę         zeć
SFX J   eć        ysz       zeć
SFX J   eć        y         zeć
SFX J   eć        ymy       zeć
SFX J   eć        ycie      zeć
SFX J   eć        ą         zeć
SFX J   eć        ę         żeć
SFX J   eć        ysz       żeć
SFX J   eć        y         żeć
SFX J   eć        ymy       żeć
SFX J   eć        ycie      żeć
SFX J   eć        ą         żeć
SFX J   ć         ę         [ęu]zić
SFX J   ć         sz        [ęu]zić
SFX J   ć         0         [ęu]zić
SFX J   ć         my        [ęu]zić
SFX J   ć         cie       [ęu]zić
SFX J   ć         ą         [ęu]zić
SFX J   ć         ję        [bfmnpw]ić
SFX J   ć         jesz      [bfmnpw]ić
SFX J   ć         je        [bfmnpw]ić
SFX J   ć         jemy      [bfmnpw]ić
SFX J   ć         jecie     [bfmnpw]ić
SFX J   ć         ją        [bfmnpw]ić
SFX J   ąść       ęsę       ąść
SFX J   ąść       ęsiesz    ąść
SFX J   ąść       ęsie      ąść
SFX J   ąść       ęsiemy    ąść
SFX J   ąść       ęsiecie   ąść
SFX J   ąść       ęsą       ąść
SFX J   eść       osę       [^j]eść
SFX J   ść        siesz     [^j]eść
SFX J   ść        sie       [^j]eść
SFX J   ść        siemy     [^j]eść
SFX J   ść        siecie    [^j]eść
SFX J   eść       osą       [^j]eść
SFX J   óść       odę       óść
SFX J   óść       odziesz   óść
SFX J   óść       odzie     óść
SFX J   óść       odziemy   óść
SFX J   óść       odziecie  óść
SFX J   óść       odą       óść
SFX J   ć         ję        [uy]ć
SFX J   ć         jesz      [uy]ć
SFX J   ć         je        [uy]ć
SFX J   ć         jemy      [uy]ć
SFX J   ć         jecie     [uy]ć
SFX J   ć         ją        [uy]ć
SFX J   łuć       olę       kłuć
SFX J   łuć       olesz     kłuć
SFX J   łuć       ole       kłuć
SFX J   łuć       olemy     kłuć
SFX J   łuć       olecie    kłuć
SFX J   łuć       olą       kłuć
SFX J   źć        zę        [^e]źć
SFX J   źć        ziesz     [^e]źć
SFX J   źć        zie       [^e]źć
SFX J   źć        ziemy     [^e]źć
SFX J   źć        ziecie    [^e]źć
SFX J   źć        zą        [^e]źć
SFX J   eźć       ozę       ieźć
SFX J   źć        ziesz     ieźć
SFX J   źć        zie       ieźć
SFX J   źć        ziemy     ieźć
SFX J   źć        ziecie    ieźć
SFX J   eźć       ozą       ieźć
SFX J   źć        zę        leźć
SFX J   źć        ziesz     leźć
SFX J   źć        zie       leźć
SFX J   źć        ziemy     leźć
SFX J   źć        ziecie    leźć
SFX J   źć        zą        leźć
