cli/src/main/resources/wordguess_hunspell_pl.dic
acylować/BEGHJej
afektować/BEGHJej
akademizować/BEGHJei
alergizować/BEGHJej
ambarkować/BEGHJej
aneksować/BEGHJej
anonimizować/BEGHJej
aportować/BEGHJej
aresztować/BEGHJej
ateizować/BEGHJej
automatyzować/BEGHJej
bajerować/BEGHJej
bandażować/BEGHJej
bazgrać/BEGHIJdikv
betonować/BEGHJej
biletować/BEGHJej
blamować/BGHJej
blokować/BEGHJej
boleć/BHIdivGJk
bóść/EGHJejk
broszować/BEGHJej
bukować/BEGHJej
buszować/BGHJej
cechować/BEGHJej
certyfikować/BEGHJej
chipować/BEGHJej
chomikować/BEGHJej
chrzęszczeć/HJdikv
craftować/BEGHJej
cynkować/BEGHJej
czekoladować/BEGHJej
ćwiekować/BEGHJej
dealować/BEGHJej
decymować/BEGHJej
defibrylować/BEGHJej
dehumanizować/BEGHJej
dekodyfikować/BEGHJej
dekorować/BEGHJej
demagnetyzować/BEGHJej
demontować/BEGHJej
depenalizować/BEGHJej
deprawować/BEGHJej
desakralizować/BEGHJej
desynchronizować/BEHJej
dezaktualizować/BEGHJej
dezynfekować/BEGHJej
dimeryzować/BEGHJej
dobudować/BEHJej
dodawać/EGHJejk
dogalopować/BHJei
doholować/BEHJej
dokapitalizowywać/BEGHJej
dokować/BEGHJej
dolecieć/HJejk
domagnesować/BEHJej
domordowywać/BEGHJej
dopatrzeć/HJejk
dopracować/BEHJej
doregulować/BEHJej
dosłyszeć/EHJdik
doszlifować/BEHJej
dośrubowywać/BEGHJej
dotrenowywać/BEGHJej
downloadować/BEGHJej
drapować/BEGHJej
drwinkować/BGHJej
dyblować/BEGHJej
dyrygować/BEGHJej
dysponować/BEGHJej
działkować/BGHJej
egalitaryzować/BEGHJej
ekshumować/BEGHJej
eksportować/BEGHJej
elegantować/BGHJej
embolizować/BEGHJej
enuncjować/BEGHJej
esować/BGHJej
ewaluować/BEGHJej
faksymilować/BEGHJei
fapować/BGHJej
fazować/BEGHJej
figurować/BGHJej
firmować/BEGHJej
flippować/BEGHJej
foluszować/BEGHJej
fosforować/BEGHJej
frasować/BEGHJej
fryzować/BEGHJej
galaretować/BEGHJej
gazyfikować/BEGHJej
giąć/BEGHJej
gloryfikować/BEGHJej
gospodarować/BEGHJej
grawerować/BEGHJej
grupować/BEGHJej
gumować/BEGHJej
hakować/BEGHJej
harkotać/BGHJej
hellenizować/BEGHJej
hisować/BEGHJej
hospitalizować/BEGHJej
hydrokrakować/BEGHJej
immobilizować/BEGHJej
inaugurować/BEGHJej
informować/BEGHJej
inkwirować/BEGHJej
intabulować/BEGHJdi
interpretować/BEGHJej
iryzować/BEGHJej
jebać/BEGHJej
jurorować/BGHJej
kalkować/BEGHJej
kanonizować/BEGHJej
karakolować/BGHJej
kartaczować/BEGHJei
kaszubizować/BEGHJej
każolować/BEGHJej
kinować/BGHJej
klauzulować/BEGHJej
kluczować/BEGHJej
kociołkować/BGHJej
kolegować/BGHJej
komasować/BEGHJej
kompresować/BEGHJej
kondycjonować/BEGHJej
konkretyzować/BEGHJej
konsygnować/BEGHJej
kontrargumentować/BGHJej
koreferować/BEGHJej
kratkować/BEGHJej
krzyczeć/EHJdikv
kursować/BGHJej
lamentować/BGHJej
letargizować/BEGHJei
lituanizować/BEGHJej
łamać/BEGHJej
majstrować/BEGHJej
maskować/BEGHJej
meldować/BEGHJej
miesiączkować/BGHJej
mizdrować/BEGHJej
morfinizować/BGHJej
naalkoholizować/BEHJej
nacierpieć/HJdik
nadlać/BEHJej
nadrukowywać/BEGHJej
nafluorowcować/BEHJej
nairytować/BHJej
nakrzemować/BEHJej
namilczeć/HJdik
napłakać/BHJej
naregulować/BEHJej
nassać/BEHJej
naszydłować/BEHJej
nawlec/BEHIJej
niedoszacować/BEHJej
nygusować/BGHJej
obelkować/BEHJej
oblachowywać/BEGHJej
obmalować/BEHJej
obrewidować/BEHJej
obstukiwać/BEGHJej
obwarować/BEHJej
ocyrklować/BEHJej
odbudować/BEHJej
odczuć/BEHJej
odfasować/BEHJei
odgrzmieć/HJdik
odintelektualizowywać/BEGHJej
odkopywać/BEGHJej
odłogować/BEGHJej
odnajmować/BEGHJej
odpierwiastkować/BHJej
odpruć/BEHJej
odrutowywać/BEGHJej
odstosunkować/BHJej
odszyć/BHJej
odtrzaskiwać/BEGHJej
odżużlować/BEHJej
ojcować/BGHJej
okrętkować/BEGHJej
omusnąć/BEFJej
opiekować/BGHJej
opresjonować/BEGHJej
orurkować/BEHJej
ostawać/GHJejk
ośmiać/BEHJej
outować/BEGHJej
paczkować/BEGHJej
parametryzować/BEGHJej
patrolować/BEGHJej
persewerować/BEGHJej
piknikować/BGHJej
plasnąć/BEFJej
pluć/BGHJej
poaportować/BEHJej
pobłyszczeć/HJdik
pochillować/BHJej
poćwiartować/BEHJej
podebatować/BHJej
podgrzać/BEHJej
podkupować/BEGHJej
podmyć/BEHJej
podpłukiwać/BEGHJej
podrujnować/BEHJei
podsumowywać/BEGHJej
podwiać/BEHJej
pofalować/BEHJej
poglazurować/BEHJej
pohodować/BEHJej
pokapować/BEHJej
pokokietować/BEHJej
pokredkować/BEHJej
polegiwać/BGHJej
połapywać/BGHJej
pomiksować/BEHJej
ponegocjować/BHJej
poodłupywać/BEHJei
popaprykować/BEHJej
popoddawać/EHJdik
poprzesypywać/BEHJej
porejestrować/BEHJej
porymować/BEHJej
poskubać/BEHJej
posterczeć/HJdik
poszczękiwać/BGHJej
poślizgiwać/BGHJej
potrollować/BEHJej
powerniksować/BEHJei
powspółczuć/BHJej
powyłuskiwać/BEHJej
powytrzepywać/BEHJej
pozapakowywać/BEHJej
poziewywać/BGHJej
półleżeć/HJdikv
premiować/BEGHJej
promenować/BGHJej
prysnąć/BEFHJej
przeborować/BEHJej
przecwałować/BEHJej
przedreptać/BEHJej
przefajnowywać/BEGHJej
przegłosowywać/BEGHJej
przeinstrumentować/BEHJej
przekierowywać/BEGHJej
przekonsultować/BEHJej
przelatywać/BEGHJej
przemalować/BEHJej
przemurowywać/BEGHJej
przepełznąć/BHIJdeij
przeprocesować/BEHJej
przerębywać/BEGHJej
przespawywać/BEGHJej
przeszmuglować/BEHJej
przetelefaksować/BEHJej
przetrzymywać/BEGHJej
przewlec/BEHIJej
przycerowywać/BEGHJej
przygadywać/BEGHJej
przykłusowywać/BGHJej
przymurować/BEHJej
przyplaskiwać/BGHJej
przystopować/BEHJej
przytrząść/EFJejk
publikować/BEGHJej
rafować/BEGHJej
recypować/BEGHJej
regulować/BEGHJej
rektyfikować/BEGHJej
repatriować/BEGHJej
retoryzować/BEGHJej
rokoszować/BGHJej
rozbłysnąć/BFHJej
rozczarowywać/BEGHJej
rozdygotać/BHJej
rozfilozofować/BHJej
rozhartować/BEHJej
rozkląć/HJej
rozlatywać/BGHJej
rozminowywać/BEGHJej
rozpiłować/BEHJej
rozpropagować/BEHJej
rozsegregowywać/BEGHJej
rozszemrywać/BGHJej
roztrajkotać/BEHIJdik
rozwzdychiwać/BEGHJej
rytować/BEGHJej
samooszukiwać/BGHJej
scerować/BEHJej
sekatorować/BEGHJei
sfanatyzować/BEHJej
sfotokopiować/BEHJej
skalibrować/BEHJej
skatalizować/BEHJej
składować/BEGHJej
skomunizować/BEHJej
skonwalidować/BEHJej
skryć/BEHJej
slawizować/BEGHJei
solmizować/BEGHJej
spasować/BEHJej
spikselować/BEHJej
spoilerować/BEGHJej
spracować/BHJej
sproszkowywać/BEGHJej
stańcować/BEHJej
sterroryzować/BEHJej
striggerować/BEHJej
subordynować/BEGHJej
symbolizować/BEGHJej
szasować/BEGHJej
sznurkować/BGHJej
szufladkować/BEGHJej
ściółkować/BEGHJej
taksować/BEGHJej
teksturować/BEGHJej
tokenizować/BEGHJej
transmitować/BEGHJej
truć/BEGHJej
tymczasować/BEHJej
uczęstować/BEHJej
ufarbować/BEHJej
ujechać/BEHJej
ukrainizować/BEGHJej
umocowywać/BEGHJej
uploadować/BEGHJej
urosnąć/BHJej
usterkiwać/BGHJej
utapirować/BEHJej
użreć/EHJdik
wartościować/BEGHJej
wdrukowywać/BEGHJej
wężykować/BEGHJej
winylować/BEGHJdi
wkopiować/BEHJej
wmontować/BEHJej
wpasowywać/BEGHJej
wrysowywać/BEGHJej
współoszukiwać/BGHJej
wszyć/BHJej
wwindować/BEHJej
wyblechować/BEHJej
wycerować/BEHJej
wycyckiwać/BEGHJej
wydepilować/BEHJej
wydziergiwać/BEGHJej
wyerodować/BEHJej
wyglancować/BEHJei
wyhartowywać/BEGHJej
wykalkulowywać/BEGHJej
wyklinowywać/BGHJej
wykropkować/BEHJej
wylawirować/BEHJej
wyłapywać/BEGHJej
wymeldowywać/BEGHJej
wynajmować/BEGHJej
wypasować/BEHJej
wypisać/BEHJej
wyprać/BEHJej
wypuncować/BEHJdi
wyrolować/BEHJej
wysiadywać/BEGHJej
wysortować/BEHJej
wysublimować/BEHJej
wysztancować/BEHJej
wytapicerować/BEHJej
wytrysnąć/BEFJej
wywieźć/BEHJej
wyżyć/BHJej
zaalokować/BEHJej
zabaraszkować/BHJdi
zabrać/BEHJej
zachipować/BEHJej
zaczarterować/BEHJej
zadokowywać/BEGHJej
zadźwięczeć/HJdik
zafrykanizować/BEHJej
zagórować/BHJej
zaholować/BEHJej
zainsynuować/BEHJej
zakapywać/BEGHJej
zakłamywać/BEGHJej
zakorkowywać/BEGHJej
zakwestionować/BEHJej
załadować/BEHJej
zameldować/BEHJej
zanatomizować/BEHJej
zaokulizować/BEHJej
zapeklować/BEHJei
zapotrzebować/BEHJej
zapruć/BHJej
zarechotać/BHJej
zasalutować/BHJej
zaspamować/BEHJej
zasyczeć/HJdik
zaszpachlować/BEHJej
zateizować/BEHJej
zatuszować/BEHJej
zawieźć/BEHJej
zbackupować/BEHJej
zblokować/BEHJej
zdawać/EGHJejk
zdekatyzować/BEHJej
zdemobilizować/BEHJej
zdeprecjonować/BEHJej
zdezinformować/BEHJej
zdruzgotać/BEHJej
zekranować/BEHJej
zespawywać/BEGHJej
zeuropeizować/BEHJej
zgonować/BGHJej
zhejtować/BEHJej
zindeksować/BEHJej
zjonizować/BEHJej
zlokalizować/BEHJej
zmapować/BEHJej
zmiarkować/BEHJej
zmonopolizować/BEHJej
zniwelować/BEHJej
zósemkować/BEHJej
zrefutować/BEHJej
zremontować/BEHJej
zrewindykować/BEHJej
zrysować/BEHJdi
zszyć/BHJej
zwekslować/BEHJej
zwulkanizować/BEHJej
żyłkować/BEGHJej
